Hawaii statutes.
[§346-374] Homeless shelter
stipends. (a) The stipend limits per shelter unit of zero bedrooms shall
be adjusted by the department annually on the first day of July pursuant to
standards established by rule, which may consider changes in the cost of operating
homeless facilities, the fair market rents, the consumer price index, or other
relevant factors. A "shelter unit of zero bedrooms" means a living
unit that is a studio unit or a single-room occupancy unit. The homeless
shelter stipend at transitional shelters for larger shelter units shall be proportional
to the difference in unit size.

(b) The department may make or may contract to
make homeless shelter stipend payments on behalf of one or more homeless
families or individuals to a provider agency operating or managing an emergency
or transitional shelter or, if the department itself operates and manages a
homeless facility, to the department in amounts and under circumstances as
provided by rule. The contract may specify a minimum total amount of homeless
shelter stipends to be received by a provider agency for making its shelter and
services available to eligible homeless families or individuals.

(c) In making homeless shelter stipend
payments to a provider agency, the department may establish minimum services to
be provided by the provider agency to homeless families or individuals at the provider
agency's shelter. The department may also direct provider agencies to
establish and manage a savings account program as described in subsection (d). Additionally,
the department may direct provider agencies to subcontract for outreach
services from other private agencies specializing in programs for the
unsheltered homeless.

(d) Provider agencies and the department may
establish and collect shelter and services payments from homeless families or
individuals in addition to the amount received in homeless shelter stipend
payments pursuant to rule. Provider agencies and the department may also set
aside a portion of the payments in a savings account to be made available to
homeless families or individuals when these families and individuals vacate the
shelter. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next